Hawaii, session 2025, SB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the campaign spending commission, the state agency for enforcement of our campaign finance laws, does not have a designated investigator position.  The existing five staff members perform investigative duties, as needed, including testifying in court when cases are prosecuted.  The legislature further finds that in order to maintain the integrity and transparency of the campaign finance process, increasing the commission staff by one investigator position is necessary. Accordingly, the purpose of this act is to establish an investigator position in the campaign spending commission. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $125,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) permanent investigator position to be placed in the campaign spending commission. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________